Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.53
Digital code, defined.

Digital code means a code which provides a purchaser with a right to obtain one or more products delivered electronically. A digital code may be obtained by any means, including email or tangible means.

Laws 2008, LB916, § 13.